Maine, session 132, LD439.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10501, sub-§9, as amended by PL 2023, c. 239, §8, is further
amended to read:
9. Possession of hunting equipment on Sunday. Possession of hunting equipment
in the fields or forests or on the waters or ice in the State on Sunday is prima facie evidence
of a violation of section 11205, unless:
A. The hunting equipment is carried, securely wrapped, in a complete cover;
B. The hunting equipment is fastened in a case; or
C. The hunting equipment is carried in at least 2 separate pieces in such a manner that
it cannot be fired, unless the separate pieces are joined together. For the purpose of
this subsection, a clip, magazine or cylinder of a firearm may not be considered a piece
of the hunting equipment. Archery equipment must be kept in a case or cover if
broadheads or field points are kept attached to the arrows or bolts.;
D. The hunting equipment is carried by a person hunting pursuant to section 11205,
subsection 1-A; or
E. The hunting equipment is carried by a person supervising a person hunting in
accordance with the requirements of section 11108-C and the supervised person is
hunting pursuant to section 11205, subsection 1-A.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §11205, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. A, §2
and affected by c. 614, §9, is amended to read:
A. Hunt wild animals or wild birds on Sunday, except as provided in subsection 1-A;
or
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §11205, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Hunting allowed on Sunday. A person who holds a valid junior hunting license
or a person 18 years of age who is enrolled in secondary school and holds a valid hunting
license may hunt wild animals or wild birds on Sunday subject to all other requirements,
laws and rules governing hunting.